North Carolina, session 2025, HB704.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 2 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new Part to read:
"Part 30B. Asian American and Pacific Islander Heritage Commission.
"§ 143B-135.7. Asian American and Pacific Islander Heritage Commission established.
(a) Creation and Duties. – There is created the Asian American and Pacific Islander
Heritage Commission in the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to advise and assist
the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources in the preservation, interpretation, and promotion
of Asian American and Pacific Islander history, arts, and culture. The Commission shall have the
following powers and duties:
(1) Advise the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources on methods and
means of preserving Asian American and Pacific Islander history, arts, and
culture.
(2) Promote public awareness of historic buildings, sites, structures, artwork, and
culture associated with North Carolina's Asian American and Pacific Islander
heritage through special programs, exhibits, and publications.
(3) Support Asian American and Pacific Islander heritage education in elementary
and secondary schools in coordination with North Carolina Public Schools.
(4) Build a statewide network of individuals and groups interested in the
preservation of Asian American and Pacific Islander history, arts, and culture.
(5) Develop a program to catalog, preserve, assess, and interpret all aspects of
Asian American and Pacific Islander history, arts, and culture.
(6) Advise the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources upon any matter the
Secretary may refer to it.
(b) Composition and Terms. – The Commission shall consist of nine members who shall
serve staggered terms. The initial board shall be selected on or before October 1, 2025, as follows:
(1) Four appointed by the Governor, two of whom shall serve terms of three years,
one of whom shall serve a term of two years, and one of whom shall serve a
term of one year. At least one appointee shall be a member of the North
Carolina Historical Commission.
*H704-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Two appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, one of whom shall serve a term of three
years and one of whom shall serve a term of two years.
(3) Two appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, one of whom shall serve a term of
two years and one of whom shall serve a term of one year.
(4) One appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Natural and Cultural
Resources who shall serve a term of three years.
Upon the expiration of the terms of the initial Commission members, each member shall be
appointed for a three-year term and shall serve until a successor is appointed.
(c) Vacancies. – A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment,
except that all unexpired terms appointed by the General Assembly shall be filled in accordance
with G.S. 120-122. Appointees to fill vacancies shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term
and until their successors have been duly appointed and qualified.
(d) Removal. – The Commission may remove any of its members for neglect of duty,
incompetence, or unprofessional conduct. A member subject to disciplinary proceedings shall be
disqualified from participating in the official business of the Commission until the charges have
been resolved.
(e) Officers. – The chair shall be designated by the Governor from among the members
of the Commission to serve as chair at the pleasure of the Governor. The Commission shall elect
annually from its membership a vice-chair and other officers deemed necessary by the
Commission to carry out the purposes of this Article.
(f) Meetings; Quorum. – The Commission shall meet at least semiannually to conduct
business. The Board shall establish the procedures for calling, holding, and conducting regular
and special meetings. A majority of Commission members shall constitute a quorum.
(g) Compensation. – The Commission members shall receive no salary as a result of
serving on the Commission but shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel expenses in
accordance with the provisions of G.S. 120-3.1, 138-5, and 138-6, as applicable."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in
recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to support the operations of the
Asian American and Pacific Islander Heritage Commission, including a director and an associate
director, established in Section 1 of this act. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources
shall provide necessary clerical and administrative support services to the Commission.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 704-First Edition